Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.070

Map of directors' districts.

Each educational service district superintendent shall prepare and keep in his or her office a map showing the boundaries of the directors' districts of all school districts in or belonging to his or her educational service district that are so divided.

[ 2008 c 159 s 9; 1990 c 33 s 324; 1985 c 385 s 29; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 106; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 140; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.390. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 38; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-57. Formerly RCW 28A.315.640, 28A.57.390, 28.57.390.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.